Utah statutes.
73-23-4.   Legislative findings.

(1)  The Legislature finds that the West Desert Pumping Project was implemented as an emergency flood control project.  The project was undertaken, specifically, to protect critical public facilities and, more generally, to abate an imminent threat to life, health, and property.

(2)  The Legislature finds that the level of the Great Salt Lake can be lowered by implementing a long-term program to develop waters upstream of the lake.  A water development program will have other beneficial uses, including the provision of municipal and industrial water to meet the needs of the state's growing population.



Enacted by Chapter 232, 1988 General Session

